Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 12.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1112
Election of merged city officers; terms; appointive city officers; terms.

(1) At the next statewide general election held after the election at which the merger is approved by the voters, the merged city officers shall be elected. Their terms shall begin at the first regular meeting of the city council in December following their election, and the terms of the incumbents in the offices involved in the plan shall be deemed to end on that day. The initial term of a merged officer shall be set forth in the merger plan.

(2) All appointive city officers shall be appointed by the person, council, or authority upon whom the power is conferred to appoint such officers in other cities of the first class. The terms of such officers shall begin at the first regular meeting of the city council in December following the first election of officers for the merged city and shall continue, unless otherwise removed, until their successors have been appointed and qualified.

Laws 2008, LB1056, § 12.